Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 71. Controlled Substances.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose, see § 1, ch. 45, SLA 1982 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For increase in classification of misdemeanors committed in connection with a criminal street gang, see AS

12.55.137

. For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47. For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

. For provisions regulating the manufacture, distribution, prescription, and dispensing of controlled substances, see AS 17.30. For provisions related to the medical use of marijuana, see AS 17.37.